lexd_components/hyw-infixal_punctuation.lexd
######################
#### This is for infixal punctuation
#### Lexicon of punctuation
#### Tags based on https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/List_of_symbols#Punctuation
#### Content based off https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Armenian_alphabet#Punctuation


PATTERNS
InfixalPunctuation?

##########################
##########################
##########################
##########################
# These are punctuation markers which are added on the stressed vowel of words
LEXICON InfixalPunctuation

+՜<punct>:՜	# Elongated marker, often used in shouting out vocatives
+՞<punct>:՞	# Question marker, often added to wh-words, polar question verbs, and the main questioned word in a question
+՛<punct>:՛	# Imperative marker, added to imperative verbs and general shouting emphasis
